Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF157.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin HILLS-BEAVER CREEK INDEPENDENT SCHOOL DISTRICT; SALES AND USE TAX EXEMPTION FOR CONSTRUCTION MATERIALS.new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Exemption; refund. new text end new text begin (a) Materials and supplies used or consumed in and equipment incorporated into the construction, reconstruction, upgrade, expansion, renovation, or remodeling of the following projects in Independent School District No. 671, Hills-Beaver Creek, are exempt from sales and use tax imposed under Minnesota Statutes, chapter 297A, if the materials, supplies, and equipment are purchased after February 29, 2024, and before January 1, 2026: new text end new text begin (1) a new elementary school and parking lot; new text end new text begin (2) repairs to a gymnasium; new text end new text begin (3) locker rooms; new text end new text begin (4) a vehicle garage; and new text end new text begin (5) a bus garage building. new text end new text begin (b) The tax must be imposed and collected as if the rate under Minnesota Statutes, section 297A.62, subdivisions 1 and 1a, applied and then refunded in the same manner provided for projects under Minnesota Statutes, section 297A.75, subdivision 1, clause (17). new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Appropriation. new text end new text begin The amount required to pay the refunds under subdivision 1 is appropriated from the general fund to the commissioner of revenue. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective retroactively for sales and purchases made after February 29, 2024, and before January 1, 2026. new text end